Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Community Work Experience Programs

205.650.
Development of programs. [Repealed.]

205.660.
Participation as a condition of receiving public assistance — Exceptions. [Repealed.]

205.670.
Specifications of types of programs — Hours — Transportation. [Repealed.]

205.680.
Conditions for types of employment. [Repealed.]

205.690.
Reports to General Assembly.

The secretary shall submit a written report to the General Assembly upon written request or appear in person before any joint interim committee of the General Assembly within thirty (30) days of a request. The following information related to the implementation of KRS 205.2003 shall be provided:

The number of recipients placed in public and private work experience programs;

The number of recipients placed in regular full-time employment; and

The costs to the Commonwealth and participating local agencies or organizations of the implementation of the work program required under KRS 205.2003.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 180, § 6; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(21); 1998, ch. 100, § 9, effective July 15, 1998; 2018 ch. 112, § 9, effective July 14, 2018.

205.700.
Participation by food stamp recipients. [Repealed.]